Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168.013, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Passenger automobile; hearse. (a) On passenger automobiles as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, and hearses, except as otherwise provided, the registration tax is calculated as $10 plus: (1) for a vehicle initially registered in Minnesota prior to November 16, 2020, 1.54 percent of the manufacturer's suggested retail price of the vehicle and the destination charge, subject to the adjustments in paragraphs (e) and (f); or (2) for a vehicle initially registered in Minnesota on or after November 16, 2020, 1.575 percent of the manufacturer's suggested retail price of the vehicle, subject to the adjustments in paragraphs (e) and (f). (b) The registration tax calculation must not include the cost of each accessory or item of optional equipment separately added to the vehicle and the manufacturer's suggested retail price. The registration tax calculation must not include a destination charge, except for a vehicle previously registered in Minnesota prior to November 16, 2020. (c) The registrar must determine the manufacturer's suggested retail price: (1) using list price information published by the manufacturer or any nationally recognized firm or association compiling such data for the automotive industry; (2) if a dealer does not determine the amount, using the retail price label as provided by the manufacturer under United States Code, title 15, section 1232; or (3) if the retail price label is not available, using the actual sales price of the vehicle. If the registrar is unable to ascertain the manufacturer's suggested retail price of any registered vehicle in the foregoing manner, the registrar may use any other available source or method. (d) The registrar must calculate the registration tax using information available to dealers and deputy registrars at the time the initial application for registration is submitted. (e) The amount under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), must be calculated based on a percentage of the manufacturer's suggested retail price, as follows: (1) during the first year of vehicle life, upon 100 percent of the price; (2) for the second year, 95 percent of the price; (3) for the third year, 90 percent of the price; (4) for the fourth year, 80 percent of the price; (5) for the fifth year, 70 percent of the price; (6) for the sixth year, 60 percent of the price; (7) for the seventh year, 50 percent of the price; (8) for the eighth year, 40 percent of the price; (9) for the ninth year, 25 percent of the price; and (10) for the tenth year, ten percent of the price. (f) For the 11th and each succeeding year, the amount under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), must be calculated as $20. (g) Except as provided in subdivision 23, for any vehicle previously registered in Minnesota and regardless of prior ownership, the total amount due under this subdivisionnew text begin and subdivision 1onew text end must not exceed the smallest total amount previously paid or due on the vehiclenew text begin under this subdivision and subdivision 1onew text end .new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 1o, the commissioner must reduce the amount due under that subdivision as necessary to meet the requirements of this paragraph.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1o. new text end new text begin Vehicle weight surcharge. new text end new text begin (a) A vehicle weight surcharge is imposed on a passenger automobile, as provided in the following weight surcharge schedule. new text end new text begin Weight Surcharge Schedule new text end new text begin Gross Vehicle Weight Rating new text end new text begin Surcharge new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 1,500 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 1,501 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 3,000 new text end new text begin 20 new text end new text begin 3,001 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 4,500 new text end new text begin 40 new text end new text begin 4,501 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 6,000 new text end new text begin 60 new text end new text begin 6,001 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 7,500 new text end new text begin 80 new text end new text begin 7,501 new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 9,000 new text end new text begin 100 new text end new text begin 9,001 or higher new text end new text begin 120 new text end new text begin (b) The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a. The commissioner must determine the weight rating from the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle, as indicated on the manufacturer's certification label. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [325F.6648] NEW MOTOR VEHICLE SALES DISCLOSURE. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "new passenger vehicle" means a new motor vehicle as defined in section 80E.03, subdivision 7, that is subject to registration as a passenger automobile, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, for operation in this state. new text end new text begin (b) Before the sale of a new passenger vehicle, a dealer must disclose and describe to the buyer: new text end new text begin (1) the vehicle's weight rating and classification under section 168.013, subdivision 1o; and new text end new text begin (2) a summary of safety, environmental, and infrastructure impacts related to motor vehicle weight. new text end new text begin (c) The disclosure must be in a clear and conspicuous written statement that is approved by the commissioner of commerce in consultation with the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin STUDY; MOTOR VEHICLE FRONT-END HEIGHT.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "passenger vehicle" means a passenger automobile, pickup truck, or one-ton pickup truck, as the terms are defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 168.002, subdivisions 21b, 24, and 26; and new text end new text begin (2) "vulnerable road user" means a vulnerable road user under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, subdivision 92b, or the operator and any passengers of a motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or motorized foot scooter, as the terms are defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, subdivisions 44, 45, and 46. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of transportation must conduct a study on motor vehicle front-end height and submit a copy to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. At a minimum, the study must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize passenger vehicle front end geometric design and pedestrian impact requirements for motor vehicle manufacturers; new text end new text begin (2) review trends in passenger vehicle front end geometric design, including but not limited to resulting safety impacts for vulnerable road users; and new text end new text begin (3) develop a methodology to identify or reasonably calculate front-end height characteristics of passenger vehicles that is able be utilized by the commissioner of public safety in conjunction with motor vehicle registration. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOTOR VEHICLE FRONT-END HEIGHT STUDY.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the driver and vehicle services operating account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of transportation for the study on motor vehicle front-end height under section 4. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end